District of Columbia statutes.
29A-917

Repealed

Voting provisions — Application to voting by delegates.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 484, ch. 397, § 17
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-817.
1981 Ed., § 29-1117.
2001 Ed., § 29-917.